Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-901
Commission on Uniform State Laws; creation; members; terms.

A commission is hereby established to be known as the Commission on Uniform State Laws which shall consist of three recognized members of the bar who shall be appointed by the Governor for terms of four years each, and until their successors are appointed, and in addition thereto any residents of this state who because of long service in the cause of the uniformity of state legislation shall have been elected life members of the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws.

Laws 1951, c. 166, § 1, p. 649.